District of Columbia statutes.
47-340.08

Authorized delegation of authority.

To the extent permitted by District and federal law, the Mayor may delegate to any authorized delegate the performance of any function authorized to be performed by the Mayor under this subchapter.

History

Sept. 20, 1995, D.C. Law 11-46, § 9, 42 DCR 3603
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-340.8.